Washington statutes.
RCW 4.60.070

Judgment on confession—Entry—Execution.

The statement must be presented to the superior court or a judge thereof, and if the same be found sufficient, the court or judge shall indorse thereon an order that judgment be entered by the clerk; whereupon it may be filed in the office of the clerk, who shall enter a judgment for the amount confessed, with costs. Execution may be issued and enforced thereon in the same manner as upon judgments in other cases.

[Code 1881 s 297; 1877 p 61 s 301; 1869 p 73 s 299; RRS s 419.]